Vermont, session 2025-2026, H108.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 15 V.S.A. § 202 is amended to read:
§ 202. PENALTY FOR DESERTION OR NONSUPPORT
A married person who, without just cause, shall desert or willfully neglect
or refuse to provide for the support and maintenance of his or her the person’s
spouse and children, leaving them in destitute or necessitous circumstances or
a parent who, without lawful excuse, shall desert or willfully neglect or refuse
to provide for the support and maintenance of his or her the child or an adult
child possessed of sufficient pecuniary or physical ability to support his or her
parents, who unreasonably neglects or refuses to provide such support when
the parent is destitute, unable to support himself or herself, and resident in this
VT LEG #378760 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.108
2025 Page 2 of 2
State, shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than
$300.00, or both. Should a fine be imposed, the court may order the same to
be paid in whole or in part to the needy spouse, parent, or to the guardian,
custodian, or trustee of the child. The Office of Child Support attorneys, in
addition to any other duly authorized person, may prosecute cases under this
section in Vermont Superior Court.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #378760 v.1